data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="π/έδιλο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλο</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλο</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εδίλου</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλο</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλα</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλα</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εδίλων</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έδιλα</l><r>έδιλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/όρακας__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>όρακας</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακα</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακα</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακα</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακες</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακες</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οράκων</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όρακες</l><r>όρακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="καλλιτ/έχνης__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>έχνης</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνη</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνη</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνη</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνες</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνες</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>εχνών</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έχνες</l><r>έχνης<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/όμμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όμμα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμμα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμματος</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμμα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμματα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμματα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ομμάτων</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όμματα</l><r>όμμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="επ/ώνυμο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμο</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμο</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωνύμου</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμο</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμα</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμα</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ωνύμων</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ώνυμα</l><r>ώνυμο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αλ/έτρι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έτρι</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έτρι</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ετριού</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έτρι</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έτρια</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έτρια</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ετριών</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έτρια</l><r>έτρι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άργυρος__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>άργυρος</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άργυρο</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αργύρου</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άργυρε</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άργυροι</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αργύρους</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αργύρων</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άργυροι</l><r>άργυρος<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="θ/έρετρο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρο</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρο</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ερέτρου</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρο</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρα</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρα</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ερέτρων</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρετρα</l><r>έρετρο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="καθαρ/ίστρια__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ίστρια</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστρια</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστριας</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστρια</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστριες</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστριες</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιστριών</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίστριες</l><r>ίστρια<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άργυρος"><i></i><par n="/άργυρος__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αλέτρι"><i>αλ</i><par n="αλ/έτρι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αντώνυμο"><i>αντ</i><par n="επ/ώνυμο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="επώνυμο"><i>επ</i><par n="επ/ώνυμο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="θέρετρο"><i>θ</i><par n="θ/έρετρο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="καθαρίστρια"><i>καθαρ</i><par n="καθαρ/ίστρια__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="καλλιτέχνης"><i>καλλιτ</i><par n="καλλιτ/έχνης__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κόμμα"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/όμμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κόρακας"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/όρακας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πέδιλο"><i>π</i><par n="π/έδιλο__n_nt"/></e>
